Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.080

Creation of district—Submittal of question to landowners—Mail ballot.

(1) A ballot shall be mailed to each owner or reputed owner of any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed lake management district, including publicly owned land, which ballot shall contain the following proposition:

"Shall lake management district No. . . . . be formed?

Yes . . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . ."

(2) A ballot shall be mailed to each owner or reputed owner of any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the proposed beach management district, including publicly owned land, which ballot shall contain the following proposition:

"Shall beach management district No. . . . . be formed?

Yes . . . . . . . .

No . . . . . . . ."

(3) In addition, the ballot shall contain appropriate spaces for the signatures of the landowner or landowners, or officer authorized to cast such a ballot. Each ballot shall include a description of the property owner's property and the estimated special assessment, or rate and charge, proposed to be imposed upon the property. A copy of the instructions and the resolution submitting the question to the landowners shall also be included.

[ 2008 c 301 s 10; 1987 c 432 s 6; 1985 c 398 s 7.]